California statutes. Elections Code
1000, 1002, 2000, 2001

0204.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1004

0205.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006,
 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3023, 3024

0206.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4010, 4011

0207.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2009, 2010, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3018

0207.07--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006,
 3007, 3008

0207.08--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1008, 1009, 2003, 2004, 2007

0208.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1024, 1025, 1040, 2005, 2006, 2008, 2009

0209.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080,
 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2149, 2150, 2151, 2152, 2153, 2154, 2155, 2156, 2157, 2158, 2159,
 2160, 2161, 2162, 2163, 2164, 2165, 2166, 2167, 2168, 2169, 2170, 2171, 2172, 2173, 2174, 2175, 2177, 2178, 2179, 2180, 2181, 2182, 2183, 2184, 2185, 2186, 2187, 2188, 2189, 2190, 2191, 2192, 2193, 2194, 2195, 2196, 2197, 2198, 2199, 2200, 2201, 2202, 2203, 2204, 2205, 2206, 2207, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051, 3052, 3053, 3054, 3055, 3056, 3057, 3058, 3059, 3060, 3061, 3062, 3063, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3069, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079

0209.04--the following census blocks:

4025

0211.02--the following census blocks:

1000,
 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1168, 1169, 1171, 1172, 1173, 1174, 1175, 1176, 1177, 1178, 2046

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21449.

Congressional District 49 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 49

ORANGE

Whole Tracts in Orange County

0320.58, 0320.59, 0320.61, 0320.62, 0320.63, 0421.07, 0421.08, 0421.09, 0421.11, 0421.12, 0421.13, 0421.14, 0421.15, 0421.16, 0422.03, 0423.12, 0423.40

Partial Tracts in Orange County

0320.22--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019

0320.57--the
 following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006

0320.64--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036

0320.66--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 5003, 5006, 5008, 5009, 5010,
 5011, 5012, 5013, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007

0421.06--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031

0422.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1044, 1045, 3000, 5033, 5034, 5035, 5036

0422.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004,
 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038

0422.06--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2012

0423.11--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013

0423.15--the following census blocks:

2007, 2008, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005

0423.41--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006

9901.00--the following census blocks:

0023, 0024, 0025

SAN DIEGO

Whole Tracts in San Diego County

0083.24, 0083.27, 0083.28, 0083.30, 0083.31, 0083.36, 0083.37, 0083.65, 0083.66, 0083.67, 0083.68, 0083.69, 0083.70, 0083.71, 0083.72, 0083.73, 0083.74, 0170.31, 0170.33, 0170.34, 0170.35, 0170.36, 0170.61, 0170.62, 0170.63, 0170.64, 0170.65, 0170.66, 0170.69, 0170.70, 0170.71, 0171.04, 0171.07, 0171.08, 0171.09, 0172.01, 0172.02, 0173.03, 0173.05, 0173.06, 0173.07, 0173.08, 0174.03, 0174.05, 0174.06, 0174.07, 0174.08, 0175.01, 0175.02, 0176.01, 0176.03, 0176.05, 0176.06, 0177.01, 0177.02, 0178.01,
 0178.08, 0178.09, 0178.10, 0178.11, 0178.13, 0179.01, 0179.02, 0180.00, 0181.01, 0181.02, 0182.01, 0182.02, 0183.01, 0183.02, 0184.00, 0185.04, 0185.09, 0185.10, 0185.11, 0185.12, 0185.15, 0185.20, 0185.21, 0185.23, 0185.24, 0185.25, 0186.01, 0186.08, 0186.09, 0186.13, 0186.15, 0186.16, 0186.17, 0186.18, 0186.19, 0186.20, 0186.21, 0186.22, 0187.00, 0188.01, 0188.03, 0188.04, 0188.05, 0189.03, 0189.04, 0189.05, 0189.06, 0193.01, 0198.03, 0198.04, 0200.15, 0200.30, 0200.33, 0200.34, 0200.35, 0215.01, 0215.02, 0221.01, 0221.02

Partial Tracts in San Diego County

0083.05--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020

0083.12--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 3000, 3001

0083.39--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1032, 1033, 1038, 1039, 1047, 1048

0083.46--the following census blocks:

2002, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3005, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016

0083.47--the following census blocks:

5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011

0083.48--the following census blocks:

3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007

0083.80--the following census blocks:

2002

0170.18--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004

0170.37--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003

0170.56--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001

0171.06--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 2000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 3000, 3001, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009,
 3010, 3011, 3012, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023

0171.11--the following census blocks:

1030, 1032, 1041, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2022

0171.12--the following census blocks:

1000, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1031, 1032, 1034, 1035

0171.13--the following census blocks:

1003, 1004, 2005, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026

0185.22--the following census
 blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1023, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013

0186.12--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010

0190.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020,
 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016

0193.03--the following census blocks:

1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2021, 3003, 3004

0193.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005

0193.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024

0197.01--the following census blocks:

1013, 1018, 1019, 1023, 1025, 1026, 2003, 2005

0198.05--the following census blocks:

1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006

0198.08--the following census blocks:

2007

0198.09--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003,
 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025

0198.10--the following census blocks:

1033, 1034, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010

0198.11--the following census blocks:

1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005,
 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015

0199.04--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1004, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1018

0200.17--the following census blocks:

2027, 2028, 2029

0200.19--the following census blocks:

3008

0200.31--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3005, 3006

0200.32--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012,
 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2010, 2011

0200.42--the following census blocks:

1006, 1008

0200.43--the following census blocks:

1004

0203.11--the following census blocks:

2022, 2026, 2027, 2028

9901.00--the following census blocks:

0001, 0002, 0003, 0004, 0005, 0006, 0007, 0008, 0009, 0010, 0011, 0012, 0013, 0020

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21450.

Congressional District 50 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 50

SAN DIEGO

Whole Tracts in San Diego County

0051.01, 0051.02, 0052.02, 0053.01, 0053.02, 0054.01, 0054.02, 0054.03, 0058.02, 0062.00, 0063.00, 0066.00, 0068.01, 0068.02, 0069.00, 0070.02, 0071.00, 0072.00, 0073.02, 0073.03, 0073.04, 0074.01, 0074.02, 0075.01, 0075.02, 0076.01, 0076.02, 0077.01, 0077.02, 0078.00, 0079.05, 0079.07, 0079.08, 0079.10, 0079.11, 0079.12, 0080.02, 0080.03, 0080.06, 0081.01, 0081.02, 0082.01, 0082.02, 0083.01, 0083.03, 0083.06, 0083.07, 0083.10, 0083.11, 0083.13, 0083.43, 0083.44, 0083.45, 0083.49, 0083.50, 0083.51, 0083.52, 0083.53,
 0083.55, 0083.56, 0083.57, 0083.58, 0083.59, 0083.60, 0083.61, 0083.62, 0083.63, 0083.64, 0083.75, 0083.76, 0083.77, 0083.78, 0083.79, 0083.81, 0085.01, 0085.02, 0085.03, 0085.04, 0085.05, 0085.06, 0085.07, 0085.09, 0085.10, 0085.11, 0085.12, 0085.13, 0086.00, 0087.01, 0088.00, 0089.01, 0090.00, 0091.01, 0091.02, 0091.03, 0091.04, 0091.07, 0091.08, 0091.09, 0094.00, 0095.04, 0099.01, 0099.02, 0108.00, 0109.00, 0111.00, 0113.00, 0166.06, 0166.09, 0166.10, 0166.13, 0166.14, 0166.15, 0166.17, 0166.18, 0166.20, 0166.21, 0170.06, 0170.09, 0170.14, 0170.20, 0170.22, 0170.39, 0170.40, 0170.41, 0170.43, 0170.44, 0170.45, 0170.46, 0170.47, 0170.48, 0170.49, 0170.50, 0170.51, 0170.52, 0170.53, 0170.54, 0170.55, 0170.57, 0170.58, 0170.59, 0170.60, 0170.67, 0170.68, 0203.12, 0204.01, 0204.05, 0207.06, 0207.10, 0207.11, 0207.12, 0208.05, 0208.06, 0208.12, 0208.13, 0214.01, 0214.02, 0216.00, 0218.00

Partial Tracts in San Diego County

0047.00--the following census blocks:

2005

0051.03--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006

0052.01--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005

0056.01--the following census blocks:

1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011

0056.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002,
 1003, 1004, 1005, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038

0058.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2015, 2016, 2017

0061.00--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2025, 2026

0065.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2034, 3000, 3001, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015,
 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037

0083.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007

0083.12--the following census blocks:

1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038

0083.39--the following census blocks:

1030, 1031, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046

0083.46--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 3004, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010

0083.47--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004

0083.48--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012

0083.80--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 2000, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000,
 3001, 3002

0089.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004

0093.07--the following census blocks:

1005

0095.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1016, 1017

0102.01--the following census blocks:

1009, 1011

0105.01--the following census blocks:

1018

0106.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004,
 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2032, 2033

0110.00--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033

0162.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1072, 1073

0165.03--the following census blocks:

1004

0166.07--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3009, 3010, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015

0166.08--the following census blocks:

1000, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011

0166.16--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2014, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2022

0166.19--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007

0167.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015

0167.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1007, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3002, 3003, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009

0169.01--the following census blocks:

1017, 1018

0170.10--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016

0170.18--the following census blocks:

2005

0170.21--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012

0170.37--the following census blocks:

3005, 3006

0170.56--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005

0171.06--the following census blocks:

2001, 3002, 3003, 3004

0171.11--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015,
 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1031, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 2020, 2021

0171.12--the following census blocks:

1030, 1033, 1036, 1037

0191.03--the following census blocks:

1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012

0191.05--the following census blocks:

2008, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023

0191.10--the following census blocks:

1007, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006,
 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3019, 3020, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033

0191.11--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2010, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012

0201.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1003

0201.06--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1012, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2002, 2003

0201.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1016, 2000, 2002

0201.10--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2017, 2018, 2020, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3046, 3047, 3048, 3049, 3050, 3051

0201.11--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2019, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012

0202.10--the following census blocks:

2004

0203.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 4000

0203.09--the following census blocks:

1024, 1027

0203.10--the following census blocks:

2004, 2006

0203.11--the following census blocks:

1005, 1006, 1007,
 1009, 1010, 1011, 1013, 1014, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1031, 1032, 1033, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2025, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035

0203.13--the following census blocks:

1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1032, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071

0204.03--the following census blocks:

1001, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026

0204.04--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015

0205.00--the following census blocks:

3013, 3022, 3025, 3026, 3027

0206.02--the following census blocks:

4007, 4008, 4009, 4012, 4013

0207.05--the following census blocks:

1009, 1010, 1011, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3019, 3020, 3021

0207.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1004, 1005, 1006, 3000, 3001

0207.08--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2005, 2006, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012

0208.01--the following census blocks:

1008, 1009, 1026, 1028, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3017

0208.07--the following census blocks:

1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1023, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1041, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022,
 2023

9901.00--the following census blocks:

0014, 0015, 0016, 0017, 0018, 0019

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21451.

Congressional District 51 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 51

SAN DIEGO

Whole Tracts in San Diego County

0001.00, 0002.01, 0002.02, 0003.01, 0003.02, 0004.00, 0005.00, 0006.00, 0007.00, 0008.00, 0009.01, 0009.02, 0010.00, 0011.00, 0012.01, 0012.02, 0013.01, 0013.02, 0014.00, 0015.00, 0017.00, 0018.01, 0018.02, 0019.00, 0020.01, 0020.02, 0021.00, 0023.01, 0027.02, 0027.03, 0027.11, 0027.12, 0028.01, 0028.03, 0028.04, 0029.02, 0029.03, 0029.04, 0029.05, 0031.03, 0031.05, 0031.14, 0031.15, 0043.00, 0044.00, 0045.01, 0055.00, 0057.00, 0059.00, 0060.00, 0087.02, 0092.01, 0092.03, 0092.04, 0093.01, 0093.05, 0093.06, 0093.08,
 0095.02, 0095.06, 0095.07, 0095.09, 0095.10, 0095.11, 0096.02, 0096.03, 0096.04, 0097.03, 0097.04, 0097.05, 0097.06, 0098.01, 0098.02, 0098.04, 0098.05, 0135.03, 0135.04, 0135.05, 0135.06, 0136.01, 0136.04, 0136.05, 0136.07, 0136.08, 0137.01, 0137.02, 0138.01, 0138.02, 0140.01, 0141.01, 0141.02, 0143.00, 0144.00, 0145.00, 0146.01, 0146.02, 0147.01, 0147.02, 0148.03, 0148.04, 0148.05, 0148.06, 0149.01, 0149.02, 0150.01, 0150.02, 0151.00, 0152.00, 0153.01, 0153.02, 0154.03, 0154.05, 0154.06, 0154.07, 0154.08, 0155.01, 0156.01, 0156.02, 0157.01, 0157.04, 0157.05, 0157.06, 0158.01, 0158.02, 0159.01, 0159.02, 0160.00, 0161.00, 0162.01, 0163.01, 0163.02, 0164.01, 0164.03, 0164.04, 0165.02, 0165.04, 0167.05, 0167.06, 0168.04, 0168.06, 0168.07, 0168.09, 0168.10, 0168.11, 0168.12, 0168.13, 0169.02, 0208.10, 0208.11, 0209.02, 0212.06

Partial Tracts in San Diego County

0016.00--the following census blocks:

4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012

0030.03--the following census blocks:

4000, 4003, 4004, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013

0031.07--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1023, 2000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3003, 3004

0032.08--the following census blocks:

1000, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005

0032.09--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2009,
 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004

0032.13--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016

0032.14--the following census blocks:

1001, 1005, 3000

0041.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3023

0041.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012

0042.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006

0046.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2009

0052.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1007, 1008, 1021

0056.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003,
 1004

0056.02--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045

0058.01--the following census blocks:

2000, 2002, 2007, 2013, 2014

0061.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2027

0065.00--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016,
 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2031, 2032, 2033, 3002, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029

0089.02--the following census blocks:

1014, 1015, 1016, 1017

0093.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015

0095.05--the following census blocks:

1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006

0140.02--the following
 census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2022

0142.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3018, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008

0155.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1030, 1031, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028

0162.02--the following census blocks:

1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1074, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011

0165.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016

0166.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008

0166.08--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004

0166.16--the following census blocks:

2005, 2006, 2007, 2012, 2013, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2021

0166.19--the following census blocks:

2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013

0167.03--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001

0167.04--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 3000, 3001, 3004, 3005

0169.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004,
 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007, 5008, 5009, 5010, 5011, 5012, 5013, 5014, 5015, 5016

0170.10--the following census blocks:

1008, 1009, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014

0170.21--the following census blocks:

2004

0208.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1027, 1029, 1030, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3018, 3019,
 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026

0208.07--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1042, 1043, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2007, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2024

0209.03--the following census blocks:

2131, 2176

0209.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041,
 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045, 4046, 4047, 4048, 4049, 4050, 4051, 4052, 4053, 4054, 4055, 4056, 4057

0212.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060,
 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 2000, 2001

0212.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026

0212.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019

0213.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1015, 1016, 1018, 1019, 1029, 2012, 2013, 2014

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21452.

Congressional District 52 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 52

SAN DIEGO

Whole Tracts in San Diego County

0022.01, 0022.02, 0023.02, 0024.01, 0024.02, 0025.01, 0025.02, 0026.01, 0026.02, 0027.05, 0027.07, 0027.08, 0027.09, 0027.10, 0030.01, 0030.04, 0031.01, 0031.08, 0031.09, 0031.11, 0031.12, 0031.13, 0032.01, 0032.02, 0032.04, 0032.07, 0032.11, 0032.12, 0033.01, 0033.03, 0033.04, 0033.05, 0034.01, 0034.03, 0034.04, 0035.01, 0035.02, 0036.01, 0036.02, 0036.03, 0038.00, 0039.01, 0039.02, 0040.00, 0048.00, 0049.00, 0050.00, 0100.01, 0100.03, 0100.04, 0100.05, 0100.09, 0100.10, 0100.11, 0100.12, 0100.13, 0100.15, 0100.16,